Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Article 7 Temporary Substitute Guardians

29-4-60.
Appointment of temporary substitute guardian; period of service; service on ward; removal.

Upon its own motion or on the petition of any interested party, including the ward, the court may appoint a temporary substitute guardian for a ward if it appears to the court that the best interest of the ward requires immediate action.

The temporary substitute guardian shall be appointed for a specified period not to exceed 120 days.

The court shall appoint as temporary substitute guardian an appropriate individual who shall serve the best interest of the ward.

Except as otherwise ordered by the court, a temporary substitute guardian has the powers set forth in the order of appointment. The authority of the previously appointed guardian is suspended for as long as the temporary substitute guardian has authority.

Notice of the appointment of a temporary substitute guardian shall be served personally on the ward. Notice of the appointment shall be served personally on the previously appointed guardian at the last address provided by that guardian to the court. Notice of the appointment shall be mailed by first-class mail to the ward’s conservator, if any.

The court may remove the temporary substitute guardian at any time. A temporary substitute guardian shall make any report the court requires. In all other respects, the provisions of this chapter apply to the temporary substitute guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-4-61.
Appointment of successor guardian and legal counsel; notice to interested parties; hearing.

The court shall appoint a successor guardian upon the resignation, death, or revocation of the letters of the guardian if the appointment of a successor guardian is in the best interest of the ward. The court shall select the successor guardian in the manner provided in Code Section 29-4-3.

The court shall appoint legal counsel for the ward. In the event of the resignation or death of the guardian, notice of the proceeding for appointment of a successor guardian shall be given as provided in Code Sections 29-4-50 and 29-4-51. In all other cases, notice of the proceeding for appointment of a successor guardian shall be served personally on the ward and the ward’s legal counsel. Notice shall be made by first-class mail to the conservator of the ward, if any, and to the following persons whose whereabouts are known and who must be persons other than the proposed successor guardian:

The spouse of the ward; and

All adult children of the ward; or

If there is no adult child, then at least two adults in the following order of priority:

Lineal descendants of the ward;

Parents and siblings of the ward; and

Friends of the ward.

After a hearing which the court deems appropriate, the court shall enter an order appointing the successor guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 693, § 11/HB 70.

The 2019 amendment,

effective January 1, 2020, substituted “29-4-3” for “29-4-11” at the end of the second sentence of subsection (a).

29-4-62.
Delivery of property and final report from predecessor guardian.

Upon the appointment of a successor guardian, the predecessor guardian or the personal representative of a deceased predecessor guardian shall deliver to the successor guardian all property of the ward held by the guardian and shall submit a final status report covering the period since the guardian’s last status report.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-4-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.